Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.04
School lands; leases; expiration.

All leases hereafter entered into by the board shall be made by the board to expire on December 31 of a given year.

Laws 1947, c. 235, § 7(5), p. 749.